Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.088

Duties of director—Retirement investments.

(1) The director shall adopt rules as necessary and exercise the following powers and duties:

(a) The director shall recommend to the state investment board types of options for member self-directed investment in the teachers' retirement system plan 3, the school employees' retirement system plan 3, and the public employees' retirement system plan 3 as deemed by the director to be reflective of the members' preferences;

(b) By July 1, 2005, subject to favorable tax determination by the internal revenue service, the director shall make optional actuarially equivalent life annuity benefit payment schedules available to members and survivors that may be purchased from the combined plan 2 and plan 3 funds under RCW 41.50.075; and

(c) Determination of the basis for administrative charges to the self-directed investment fund to offset self-directed account expenses;

(2) The director shall recommend to the state investment board types of options for participant self-directed investment in the state deferred compensation plan, as deemed by the director to be reflective of the participants' preferences.

[ 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 28; 2005 c 327 s 14; 2000 c 247 s 602. Prior: 1998 c 341 s 507; 1998 c 116 s 10; 1995 c 239 s 302.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 26; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 43.03.027.

Effective dates—Subchapter headings not law—2000 c 247: See RCW 41.40.931 and 41.40.932.

Effective date—1998 c 341: See note following RCW 41.34.060.

Intent—Purpose—1995 c 239: See note following RCW 41.32.831.

Effective date—Part and subchapter headings not law—1995 c 239: See notes following RCW 41.32.005.

Benefits not contractual right until date specified: RCW 41.34.100.